Alabama, session 2026rs, HB320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 11-25-7 and 12-19-310 are amended
to read as follows:
"§11-25-7
Upon the establishment of a county law library under
the provisions of this chapter, each county shall have and
maintain a separate fund within the county treasury known as
the County Law Library Fund and may have a separate law
library fund for each law library in the county. The county
law library funds shall consist of fundsmonies appropriated by
the state, county, or municipal governments,; fundsmonies
collected under the provisions of law,; proceeds from the sale
of copies, books, and other materials, or received from
donations, gifts, grants, and funds other than those
appropriated, and shall be audited as other county funds are
audited. SaidA county law library fund may be used to match
grants for library purposes. Library funds may be used to pay
library personnel. All purchases by or on behalf of sucha
county law library shall be exempt from all State of Alabama,
county, or municipal sales, use, or other similar taxes."
"§12-19-310
(a) In addition to the docket fees now authorized by
law, additional docket fees shall be assessed in all circuit,
district, and municipal courts as follows:
(1) In civil cases in the circuit and district courts,
except child support cases and as further provided for small
claims cases, an additional docket fee of forty-five dollars
($45) and in small claims cases an additional docket fee of
Page 2

($45) and in small claims cases an additional docket fee of
HB320 INTRODUCED
fifteen dollars ($15).
(2) In criminal cases in the circuit, district, and
municipal courts, except juvenile cases and as further
provided for traffic cases, an additional docket fee of forty
dollars ($40) and in traffic cases, but excluding parking
violations, an additional docket fee of twenty-six dollars
($26).
(b)(1) Two dollars ($2) of the traffic docket fee shall
be distributed to the Police Officers' Annuity Fund before any
distribution pursuant to subsections (c) and (d).
(2) Ten dollars ($10) of each fee in municipal court
shall be retained by the presiding municipal judge or the
municipal court clerk for operation of the municipal court
and, before any distribution in subsections (c) and (d),
distributed to the municipality for the operation of the
municipal courts.
(c) There is established in the State Treasury the
State Judicial Administration Fund. Two-thirds of the docket
fees collected pursuant to subsection (a) shall be distributed
to the fund and used by the Administrative Office of Courts as
determined by the Administrative Director of Courts for the
operation of courts in this state.
(d) There is established in each judicial circuit of
this state the Presiding Circuit Judge's Judicial
Administration Fund and in each county in this state the
Circuit Clerk's Judicial Administration Fund. One-sixth of the
docket fees collected in each circuit pursuant to subsection
(a) shall be distributed to the Presiding Circuit Judge's
Page 3

(a) shall be distributed to the Presiding Circuit Judge's
HB320 INTRODUCED
Judicial Administration Fund in the circuit and maintained
within the county treasuryin the circuit. One-sixth of the
docket fees collected in each county pursuant to subsection
(a) shall be distributed to the Circuit Clerk's Judicial
Administration Fund in the county.
(e)(1) The funds distributed pursuant to subsection (d)
shall be expended for the support of local court operations,
including, but not limited to, salaries and benefits of court
employees where necessary for the efficient operations of the
courts in the circuit and for other expenses as individually
determined necessary by the presiding circuit judge or any
circuit clerk to promote efficient administration of justice.
Funds distributed pursuant to subsection (d) shall not reduce
the amount payable to the presiding circuit judge or any
circuit clerk under any local act or general act or reduce or
100 affect the amounts of funding allocated by the Administrative
101 Office of Courts to the budget of the presiding circuit judge
102 or any circuit clerk.
103 (2) In addition to subdivision (1) relating to the
104 circuit clerk, each clerk, at his or her discretion, may use
105 the money in the Circuit Clerk's Judicial Administration Fund
106 for the purpose of awarding merit and promotionspromotion
107 raises to full-time employees of the clerk's office.
108 (f) All expenditures of funds pursuant to this section
109 shall be audited as all other state funds are audited.
110 (g) The docket fees assessed pursuant to this section
111 shall not be waived or remitted by the court unless all docket
112 fees associated with the case are waived or remitted.
Page 4

fees associated with the case are waived or remitted.
HB320 INTRODUCED
113 (h) The court clerk shall distribute the fees provided
114 for in this section on a monthly basis as other costs and fees
115 are distributed."
116 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
117 1, 2026.
Page 5